ru: Направление преобразования: Аналоговый в цифровой; Двунаправленный; Цифровой в аналоговый; Преобразование формата (цифровой в цифровой); Преобразование частоты; Преобразование частоты развертки; Однонаправленный; Другой
es: Dirección de conversión: Analógico a digital; Bidireccional; Digital a analógico; Conversión de formato (digital a digital); Conversión de frecuencia; Conversión de frecuencia de escaneo; Unidireccional; Otros
cs: Směr konverze: Analogové na digitální; Obousměrný; Digitální na analogové; Převod formátu (digitální na digitální); Převod frekvence; Převod snímkové frekvence; Jednosměrný; Jiné
sl-SI: Smer pretvorbe: Analogno v digitalno; Dvosmerna; Digitalno v analogno; Pretvorba formata (digitalno v digitalno); Pretvorba frekvence; Pretvorba hitrosti skeniranja; Enosmeren; Drugo
tr: Dönüştürme yönü: Analogdan dijitale; Çift yönlü; Dijitalden analoga; Format dönüşümü (dijitalden dijitale); Frekans dönüşümü; Tarama hızı dönüşümü; Tek yönlü; Diğer
pt-PT: Direção da conversão: Analógico para digital; Bidirecional; Digital para analógico; Conversão de formato (digital para digital); Conversão de frequência; Conversão de taxa de digitalização; Unidirecional; Outro
zh-CN: 转换方向: 模拟转数字; 双向; 数字转模拟; 格式转换（数字转数字）; 频率转换; 扫描率转换; 单指向; 其他
hr-HR: Smjer konverzije: Analogno u digitalno; Dvosmjerni; Digitalno u analogno; Konverzija formata (digitalno u digitalno); Konverzija frekvencije; Konverzija brzine skeniranja; Jednosmjerni; Ostalo
pt-BR: Direção da conversão: Analógico para digital; Bidirecional; Digital para analógico; Conversão de formato (digital para digital); Conversão de frequência; Conversão de taxa de varredura; Unidirecional; Outro
vi: Hướng chuyển đổi: Tương tự sang kỹ thuật số; Hai chiều; Kỹ thuật số sang tương tự; Chuyển đổi định dạng (kỹ thuật số sang kỹ thuật số); Chuyển đổi tần số; Chuyển đổi tốc độ quét; Một chiều; Khác
zh-TW: 轉換方向: 類比轉數位; 雙向; 數位轉類比; 格式轉換（數位轉數位）; 頻率轉換; 掃描率轉換; 單指向性; 其他
fi: Muunnossuunta: Analoginen digitaaliseksi; Kaksisuuntainen; Digitaalinen analogiseksi; Muodon muunnos (digitaalinen digitaaliseksi); Taajuusmuunnos; Pyyhkäisytaajuuden muunnos; Yksisuuntainen; Muu
lt-LT: Konvertavimo kryptis: Analoginis į skaitmeninį; Dvikryptis; Skaitmeninis į analoginį; Formato konvertavimas (skaitmeninis į skaitmeninį); Dažnio konvertavimas; Skenavimo dažnio konvertavimas; Vienakryptis; Kita
el: Κατεύθυνση μετατροπής: Αναλογικό σε ψηφιακό; Αμφίδρομο; Ψηφιακό σε αναλογικό; Μετατροπή μορφής (ψηφιακό σε ψηφιακό); Μετατροπή συχνότητας; Μετατροπή ρυθμού σάρωσης; Μονοκατευθυντικό; Άλλο
ko: 변환 방향: 아날로그에서 디지털로; 양방향; 디지털에서 아날로그로; 포맷 변환 (디지털에서 디지털로); 주파수 변환; 스캔 속도 변환; 단방향; 기타
de: Konvertierungsrichtung: Analog zu digital; Bidirektional; Digital zu analog; Formatkonvertierung (digital zu digital); Frequenzkonvertierung; Abtastratenkonvertierung; Unidirektional; Sonstiges
pl: Kierunek konwersji: Analogowy na cyfrowy; Dwukierunkowy; Cyfrowy na analogowy; Konwersja formatu (cyfrowy na cyfrowy); Konwersja częstotliwości; Konwersja częstotliwości skanowania; Jednokierunkowy; Inne
nl: Conversierichting: Analoog naar digitaal; Bidirectioneel; Digitaal naar analoog; Formaatconversie (digitaal naar digitaal); Frequentieconversie; Scansnelheid conversie; Unidirectioneel; Andere
sv: Konverteringsriktning: Analog till digital; Dubbelriktad; Digital till analog; Formatkonvertering (digital till digital); Frekvenskonvertering; Skanningsfrekvenskonvertering; Enkelriktad; Övrigt
it: Direzione di conversione: Da analogico a digitale; Bidirezionale; Da digitale ad analogico; Conversione formato (da digitale a digitale); Conversione di frequenza; Conversione frequenza di scansione; Unidirezionale; Altro
th: ทิศทางการแปลง: อนาล็อกเป็นดิจิทัล; แบบสองทาง; ดิจิทัลเป็นอนาล็อก; การแปลงรูปแบบ (ดิจิทัลเป็นดิจิทัล); การแปลงความถี่; การแปลงอัตราการสแกน; ไมค์ยูนิไดเร็คชันแนล; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Direcția de conversie: Analogic la digital; Bidirecțional; Digital la analogic; Conversie format (digital la digital); Conversie frecvență; Conversie rată de scanare; Unidirecțional; Altele
da: Konverteringsretning: Analog til digital; Tovejs; Digital til analog; Formatkonvertering (digital til digital); Frekvenskonvertering; Scanningsfrekvenskonvertering; Ensrettet; Andet
sk-SK: Smer konverzie: Analógový na digitálny; Obojsmerný; Digitálny na analógový; Konverzia formátu (digitálny na digitálny); Konverzia frekvencie; Konverzia skenovacej frekvencie; Jednosmerný; Iné
nb: Konverteringsretning: Analog til digital; Toveis; Digital til analog; Formatkonvertering (digital til digital); Frekvenskonvertering; Skannefrekvenskonvertering; Enveis; Annet
en: Conversion direction: Analog to digital; Bidirectional; Digital to analog; Format conversion (digital to digital); Frequency conversion; Scan rate conversion; Unidirectional; Other
fr: Direction de conversion: Analogique vers numérique; Bidirectionnel; Numérique vers analogique; Conversion de format (numérique vers numérique); Conversion de fréquence; Conversion de fréquence de balayage; Unidirectionnel; Autre
hu: Átalakítás iránya: Analógról digitálisra; Kétirányú; Digitálisról analógra; Formátum átalakítás (digitálisról digitálisra); Frekvencia átalakítás; Pásztázási sebesség átalakítás; Egyirányú; Egyéb
ja: 変換方向: アナログからデジタル; 双方向; デジタルからアナログ; フォーマット変換（デジタルからデジタル）; 周波数変換; スキャンレート変換; 単一指向性; その他
bg-BG: Посока на преобразуване: Аналогов към дигитален; Двупосочен; Дигитален към аналогов; Преобразуване на формат (дигитален към дигитален); Преобразуване на честота; Преобразуване на честота на сканиране; Еднопосочен; Други